Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1948.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 73PROHIBITED AGREEMENTSSec.7301. Short title of chapter.7302. Definitions.7303. Prohibited agreements.7304. Enforcement.7305. Applicability.§ 7301. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Protect 12345678910111213141516171819 Pennsylvania's Academic Freedom Act.§ 7302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Awarding agency." A Commonwealth agency that awards a State grant or loan under a State grant or loan program."Commonwealth agency." An executive agency or independent agency."Executive agency." The Governor and any department, board, commission, authority or other agency or officer of the Commonwealth. The term does not include a court or other agency or officer of the unified judicial system or the General Assembly and any of its agencies or officers."Independent agency." A board, commission, authority or other agency or officer of the Commonwealth that is not subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor. The term does not include a court or other agency or officer of the unified judicial system or the General Assembly and any of its agencies or officers."Institution of higher education." The term includes any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University or any other institution designated as State-related by the 20250HB1948PN2457 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(4) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(5) A college established under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(6) An institution of higher education located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees under section 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and as provided for by the standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under Chapter 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).(7) A private school licensed under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act.(8) A foreign corporation approved to operate an educational enterprise under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 36 (relating to foreign corporation standards)."State grant or loan." A State grant or loan authorized by a law of this Commonwealth. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A tax benefit or tax credit as defined in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) A procurement as defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions).(3) Money appropriated or transferred for any other purpose other than a State grant or loan.§ 7303. Prohibited agreements.As a condition of receipt of a State grant or loan, an institution of higher education may not enter into a compact or 20250HB1948PN2457 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other voluntary agreement with the Federal Government that, except as required under law, limits the ability of the institution of higher education to make operational decisions on any of the following matters:(1) Admissions processes, including the admission of foreign students.(2) Hiring decisions.(3) Academic curriculum.(4) Disciplinary policies.(5) Tuition policies.(6) Grading policies.(7) Freedom of speech for students and staff.(8) Treatment of students based on the student's membership in a racial, ethnic, national or religious group or a group based on sex, sexual orientation or gender identity.(9) Establishing or abolishing institutional organizations.§ 7304. Enforcement.This chapter shall be enforced as follows:(1) An institution of higher education that enters into a compact or voluntary agreement in violation of section 7303 (relating to prohibited agreements) and, after the effective date of this section, receives a State grant or loan shall transmit a notice to the awarding agency.(2) After receipt of the notice under paragraph (1), the awarding agency shall submit a notice for repayment to the institution of higher education. The notice shall specify the amount to be repaid and a deadline for repayment as determined by the awarding agency. The repayment under this 20250HB1948PN2457 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be in the form and manner directed by the awarding agency and may include the amount of the State grant or loan and interest, income, accumulations and the monetary equivalent of any appreciation in value of real, personal or mixed property purchased with the proceeds of the State grant or loan as determined by the awarding agency.(3) After receipt of the notice under paragraph (2), the institution of higher education shall repay the amount of the State grant or loan to the awarding agency in accordance with the notice.(4) If the institution of higher education fails or refuses to pay the amount demanded under paragraph (2), the awarding agency may refer the matter to the Office of Attorney General, which shall institute an action in an appropriate court to recover the repayment.§ 7305. Applicability.This chapter shall apply as follows:(1) This chapter shall only apply to a State grant or loan issued by an awarding agency to an institution of higher education on or after the effective date of this section.(2) This chapter shall not apply to a State grant or loan to the extent this chapter conflicts with Federal or State law.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1948PN2457 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324